Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB908.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 13A.3102 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An ordinary administrative regulation with a last effective date on or after March 1,
2013, shall expire seven (7) years after its last effective date, except as provided by
the certification process in KRS 13A.3104.
(2) An ordinary administrative regulation with a last effective date before March 1,
2013, shall expire on March 1, 2020, except as provided by the certification process
in KRS 13A.3104.
(3) For all administrative regulations that expire under this section or KRS 13A.3104,
the regulations compiler shall:
(a) Delete them from the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service;
(b) Add them to the list of ineffective administrative regulations; and
(c) [Beginning on September 1, 2020, and ]At least once every six (6) months[
thereafter], publish a list of administrative regulations that have expired since
the most recent previous list was published under this paragraph.
(4) [Within three (3) months of June 27, 2019, and ]At least once every six (6) months[
thereafter], the regulations compiler shall publish a list of existing administrative
regulations and their corresponding last effective dates.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/2/2026 10:52 AM Jacketed